District of Columbia statutes.
1-129.33

Annual reporting requirements.

(a)

The Commission shall submit to the Mayor and the Chairman of the Council by September 1, 2015, and on a biannual basis thereafter, a detailed report including:

(1)

The Commission’s activities, revenues, and expenditures;

(2)

The full name, value, and form of each gift, grant, bequest, or appropriation to the New Columbia Statehood Fund; and

(3)

Any other information considered appropriate by the Commission.

(b)

The Commission shall make each report available to the general public upon request.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-171, § 33
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 101(b), 62 DCR 1884